hfst-language-module/apertium-{{languageCode}}.{{languageCode}}.lexc
! Morphological Transducer for {{languageName}}

Multichar_Symbols

! Part of speech categories
%<n%>      ! Noun
%<v%>      ! Verb
%<adj%>    ! Adjective
%<num%>    ! Numeral

%<sent%>   ! Sentence-ending punctuation
%<guio%>   ! Hyphen
%<cm%>     ! Comma
%<apos%>   ! Apostrophe
%<quot%>   ! Quotation mark
%<lquot%>  ! Left quotation mark
%<rquot%>  ! Right quotation mark
%<lpar%>   ! Left parenthesis
%<rpar%>   ! Right parenthesis

! Number morphology
%<pl%>     ! Plural
%<sg%>     ! Singular

! Other symbols
%>         ! Morpheme boundary
{{if_twoc
! Path features
%[%-sg%]
%[%+sg%]
%[%-pl%]
%[%+pl%]

if_twoc}}

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root

!! List lexicons here
!! Example:
! NounRoot ;

Numeral ;
Punctuation ;

! Example noun inflection
! LEXICON RegNounInfl
! %<n%>%<sg%>: # ;
! %<n%>%<pl%>:%>s # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

! Example lexical entries
! LEXICON NounRoot
! house:house RegNounInfl ; ! A noun


LEXICON Numeral
<[ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ]+> NumInfl ;

LEXICON NumInfl
%<num%>: # ;


LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ; 
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<quot%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;


! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Lexicon
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/List_of_symbols
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Lttoolbox_and_lexc
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Apertium-specific_conventions_for_lexc
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! http://www.cis.upenn.edu/~cis639/docs/lexc.html
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
